Utah statutes.
57-1-44.   Other sections not affected.

Sections 57-1-39 through 57-1-43 do not excuse a beneficiary, mortgagee, trustee, secured lender, or servicer from complying with the provisions of Section 57-1-38.



Enacted by Chapter 185, 1995 General Session

